dictionaries/ckb-IQ.dic
20
چۆنی
باشی
من
تۆ
لە
بۆ
کردن
بڕین
بردن
دزین
خوارد/tp
کارکردن
کاردەکەم
مامۆستا/koj1
دار/koj1
